Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9501
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-9501 to 71-9511 shall be known and may be cited as the Direct Primary Care Agreement Act.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 1.
July 21, 2016